Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 6
Rules of Construction

§ 15-2-601. Requirement that devisee survive testator by 120 hours.

A devisee who does not survive the testator by one hundred twenty (120) hours is treated as if he predeceased the testator, unless the will of decedent contains some language dealing explicitly with simultaneous deaths or deaths in a common disaster, or requiring that the devisee survive the testator or survive the testator for a stated period in order to take under the will.

§ 15-2-602. Choice of law as to meaning and effect of wills.

The meaning and legal effect of a disposition in a will shall be determined by the local law of a particular state selected by the testator in his instrument unless the application of that law is contrary to the provisions relating to the elective share described in [sections] 15-2-201 through 15-2-209[, Idaho Code], the provisions relating to the exempt property and allowances described in [sections] 15-2-401 through 15-2-405[, Idaho Code,] or any other public policy of this state otherwise applicable to the disposition.

§ 15-2-603. Rules of construction and intention.

The intention of a testator as expressed in his will controls the legal effect of his dispositions. The rules of construction expressed in the succeeding sections of this Part apply unless a contrary intention is indicated by the will.

§ 15-2-604. Construction that will passes all property — After-acquired property.

A will is construed to pass all property which the testator owns at his death including property acquired after the execution of the will.

§ 15-2-605. Anti-lapse — Deceased devisee — Class gifts.

If a devisee who is a grandparent or a lineal descendant of a grandparent of the testator is dead at the time of execution of the will, fails to survive the testator, or is treated as if he predeceased the testator, the issue of the deceased devisee who survive the testator by one hundred twenty (120) hours take in place of the deceased devisee and if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the devisee they take equally, but if of unequal degree then those of more remote degree take by representation. One who would have been a devisee under a class gift if he had survived the testator is treated as a devisee for purposes of this section whether his death occurred before or after the execution of the will.

§ 15-2-606. Failure of testamentary provision.

Except as provided in section 15-2-605[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, if a devise other than a residuary devise fails for any reason, it becomes a part of the residue.

Except as provided in section 15-2-605[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, if the residue is devised to two (2) or more persons and the share of one (1) of the residuary devisees fails for any reason, his share passes to the other residuary devisee, or to other residuary devisees in proportion to their interests in the residue.

§ 15-2-607. Change in securities — Accessions — Nonademption.

If the testator intended a specific devise of certain securities rather than the equivalent value thereof, the specific devisee is entitled only to:

as much of the devised securities as is a part of the estate at the time of the testator’s death;

any additional or other securities of the same entity owned by the testator by reason of action initiated by the entity excluding any acquired by exercise of purchase options;

securities of another entity owned by the testator as a result of a merger, consolidation, reorganization or other similar action initiated by the entity; and

any additional securities of the entity owned by the testator as a result of a plan of reinvestment if it is a regulated investment company.

Distributions prior to death with respect to a specifically devised security not provided for in subsection (a) of this section are not part of the specific devise.

§ 15-2-608. Nonademption of specific devises in certain cases — Unpaid proceeds of sale, condemnation or insurance — Sale by conservator.

A specified devisee has the right to the remaining specifically devised property and:

Any balance of the purchase price (together with any security interest) owing from a purchaser to the testator at death by reason of sale of the property;

Any amount of a condemnation award for the taking of the property unpaid at death;

Any proceeds unpaid at death on fire or casualty insurance on the property; and

Property owned by testator at his death as a result of foreclosure, or obtained in lieu of foreclosure, of the security for a specifically devised obligation.

If specifically devised property is sold by a conservator, or if a condemnation award or insurance proceeds are paid to a conservator as a result of condemnation, fire, or casualty, the specific devisee has the right to a general pecuniary devise equal to the net sale price, the condemnation award, or the insurance proceeds. This subsection does not apply if subsequent to the sale, condemnation or casualty, it is adjudicated that the disability of the testator has ceased and the testator survives the adjudication by one (1) year. The right of the specific devisee, under this subsection is reduced by any right he has under subsection (a) of this section.

§ 15-2-609. Nonexoneration.

A specific devise passes subject to any security interest existing at the date of death, without right of exoneration, regardless of a general directive in the will to pay debts.

§ 15-2-610. Exercise of power of appointment.

A general residuary clause in a will, or a will making general disposition of all of the testator’s property, does not exercise a power of appointment held by the testator unless specific reference is made to the power or there is some other indication of intention to include the property subject to the power.

§ 15-2-611. Construction of generic terms to accord with relationships as defined for intestate succession.

Half bloods, adopted persons and persons born out of wedlock are included in class gift terminology and terms of relationship in accordance with rules for determining relationships for purposes of intestate succession, but a person born out of wedlock is not treated as the child of the father unless the person is openly and notoriously so treated by the father.

§ 15-2-612. Ademption by satisfaction.

Property which a testator gave in his lifetime to a person is treated as a satisfaction of a devise to that person in whole or in part, only if the will provides for deduction of the lifetime gift, or the testator declares in a contemporaneous writing that the gift is to be deducted from the devise or is in satisfaction of the devise, or the devisee acknowledges in writing that the gift is in satisfaction. For purpose of partial satisfaction, property given during lifetime is valued as of the time the devisee came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of death of the testator, whichever occurs first.

§ 15-2-613. Simultaneous death — Disposition of property.

Subject to extension by the provisions of section 15-2-104[, Idaho Code,] and section 15-2-601[, Idaho Code,] of this code, where the title to property or the devolution thereof depends upon priority of death and there is no sufficient evidence that the persons have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property of each person shall be distributed as if he had survived, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Where two (2) or more beneficiaries are designated to take successively by reason of survivorship under another person’s distribution of property and there is no sufficient evidence that these beneficiaries have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property thus disposed of shall be divided into as many equal portions as there are successive beneficiaries and these portions shall be distributed respectively to those who would have taken in the event that each designated beneficiary had survived.

Where there is no sufficient evidence that two (2) joint tenants have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property so held shall be distributed one-half (½) as if one had survived and one-half (½) as if the other had survived. If there are more than two (2) joint tenants and all of them have so died, the property thus distributed shall be in the proportion that one bears to the whole number of joint tenants.

Where the insured and the beneficiary in a policy of life or accident insurance have died and there is no sufficient evidence that they have died otherwise than simultaneously, the proceeds of the policy shall be distributed as if the insured had survived the beneficiary.

This section shall not apply in the case of wills, living trusts, deeds, or contracts of insurance, wherein provision has been made for distribution of property different from the provisions of the section.

This section shall be so construed and interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact it.

This section may be cited as the “uniform simultaneous death act.”

§ 15-2-614. Effect of devise.

Every devise in any will conveys all of the estate of the devisor therein which he could lawfully devise, unless it clearly appears by the will that he intended to convey a lesser estate.

§ 15-2-615. Restriction on charitable devises. [Repealed.]

§ 15-2-616. Restriction on devises to nursing home or residential or assisted living facility operators.

A devise or bequest involving either real or personal property, directly or indirectly, to any person who owns, operates or is employed at a nursing home, residential or assisted living facility or any home, including the testator’s home, whether or not licensed, in which the testator was a resident within one (1) year of his death shall be presumed to have been the result of undue influence, rebuttable by clear and convincing evidence. This section shall apply to all property passing by testate succession after July 1, 1983, regardless of when the will was written; provided, this section shall in no way limit or affect the rights of a beneficiary who is related to the testator, or who is a charitable or benevolent society or corporation; provided further that the foregoing limitations shall not apply to wills of persons whose death is caused by accidental means and whose wills are executed prior to the accident which results in death.